Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-210.01
Captivity, defined.

Captivity means a condition which limits or restricts the free egress or free range of wild birds, wild mammals, or wildlife by the use of fences, barriers, or restraints.

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 17.